North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 4B. Safety Features of Trailers.

§ 66-27.5.
House trailers to have two doors.

In order to provide greater protection from the dangers of fire, every new house trailer having a body length exceeding 32 feet and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1970, and sold in this State shall, if such house trailer is to be used as a residence or dwelling within this State, be equipped with at least two doors. These doors shall be located in the vicinity of the front and rear rooms of the house trailer. Provided, however, this section shall not apply: to any (i) travel trailer which is factory equipped for the road and designed to be used as a dwelling for travel, recreational or vacation use, if such travel trailer does not exceed 32 feet in length; (ii) to any house trailer of any length sold in North Carolina for use in a state other than North Carolina.

It shall be unlawful for any dealer to sell in this State any house trailer manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1970, having a body length exceeding 32 feet which does not conform to the specifications set forth in subsection (a). Any dealer who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1969, c. 463; 1993, c. 539, s. 511; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 66-27A.

Recodified as

G.S. 66-27.01

by Session Laws 1997-456, s. 27.